Utah statutes.
53A-1a-509.   Noncompliance -- Rulemaking.

(1)  If a charter school is found to be out of compliance with the requirements of Section 53A-1a-507 or the school's charter, the chartering entity shall notify the following in writing that the charter school has a reasonable time to remedy the deficiency, except as otherwise provided in Subsection 53A-1a-510(4):

(a)  the governing body of the charter school; and

(b)  if the charter school is a qualifying charter school with outstanding bonds issued in accordance with Chapter 20b, Part 2, Charter School Credit Enhancement Program, the Utah Charter School Finance Authority.

(2)  If the charter school does not remedy the deficiency within the established timeline, the chartering entity may:

(a)  subject to the requirements of Subsection (4), take one or more of the following actions:

(i)  remove a charter school director or finance officer;

(ii)  remove a governing board member; or

(iii)  appoint an interim director or mentor to work with the charter school; or

(b)  subject to the requirements of Section 53A-1a-510, terminate the school's charter.

(3)  The costs of an interim director or mentor appointed pursuant to Subsection (2)(a) shall be paid from the funds of the charter school for which the interim director or mentor is working.

(4)  The chartering entity shall notify the Utah Charter School Finance Authority before the chartering entity takes an action described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) through (iii) if the charter school is a qualifying charter school with outstanding bonds issued in accordance with Chapter 20b, Part 2, Charter School Credit Enhancement Program.

(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the State Board of Education shall make rules:

(a)  specifying the timeline for remedying deficiencies under Subsection (1); and

(b)  ensuring the compliance of a charter school with its approved charter.

